Utah statutes.
53C-4-303.   Public land grants -- Procedures for selection of additional
lands.
(1)  All selections of land shall be made in legal subdivisions according to
the United States survey.
(2)  When a selection has been made and approved by the director, the director
shall take action necessary to secure the approval of the proper officers of
the United States and the final transfer of the lands selected to this state.
(3)  The director may cancel, relinquish, or release the claims of the state
to, and may reconvey to the United States, any particular tract of land
erroneously listed to the state, or any tract upon which, at the time of
selection, a bona fide claim has been initiated by an actual settler.
